Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 3

Mortgage Loan Originators

45-13-301. Mortgage loan originator — License required.

An individual, unless specifically exempted under subsection (b), shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator with respect to any dwelling located in this state without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license issued by the commissioner and without first being sponsored in accordance with § 45-13-303. Each individual must register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in order to qualify for a mortgage loan originator license. The issuance of a mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker license to an individual does not exempt that individual from the requirements of this section.

Registered mortgage loan originators, as defined in § 45-13-105, as well as any individuals described in § 45-13-201(b), are exempt from this chapter.

An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a mortgage loan originator license issued under this part.

Any individual acting as a loss mitigation specialist shall not be required to comply with the licensing requirements of this section until July 30, 2011, or such other date as may be determined by the commissioner with the approval or consent of the United States department of housing and urban development. A loss mitigation specialist may refer a mortgagor to a mortgage loan originator for purposes of refinancing the residential mortgage loan without the requirement of a license under this part; provided, that the loss mitigation specialist does not receive any compensation or gain for the referral; and provided, further, that the referral is made in accordance with any applicable state and federal law.

A mortgage loan originator license is not required for any individual performing the activities of a manufactured home retailer or a dealer of modular building units; provided, that:

The individual either holds or is employed by a person who holds a manufactured home retailer license or a license to act as a dealer of modular building units that has been issued by the commissioner of commerce and insurance under title 68, chapter 126;

The individual does not in any way offer or negotiate terms of a residential mortgage loan, including by counseling with respect to such terms;

Neither the individual, nor the employing manufactured home retailer or dealer of modular building units, receives compensation or other gain from a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan originator, or by any agent of the mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan originator; and

This subsection (f) shall not apply if the United States department of housing and urban development determines by guideline, rule, interpretative letter or otherwise that the individuals must be licensed under the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.), or that this subsection (f) is otherwise inconsistent with the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Attorney General Opinions. An individual investment property owner who provides a purchaser with financing that qualifies as a “residential mortgage loan” must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-201, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. Additionally, such an individual who provides such financing for compensation or gain or in the expectation thereof must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-301, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. OAG 10-93, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (8/24/10).

45-13-302. Issuance of mortgage loan originator license.

Individuals applying for a mortgage loan originator license shall complete and file a form as prescribed by the commissioner and shall pay a nonrefundable licensing fee of one hundred dollars ($100). The fee may be decreased or increased by rule of the commissioner, and constitutes the licensing fee for the first year of licensing or part of the first year. Each such application form shall be in writing and under oath and shall contain any information the commissioner deems necessary, including the following:

The individual's name, date of birth, social security number and address;

The name of any person for whom the individual intends to provide origination services and the address of the office at which the individual will be stationed;

Information pertaining to the individual's personal history and experience; and

The individual's authorization for the commissioner or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, or both, to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency, as defined in § 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p)); and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

In connection with an application for a mortgage loan originator license, the applicant shall furnish fingerprints to the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent, such as the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, for submission to the federal bureau of investigation or any other governmental agency or entity, or both, authorized to receive the information, such as the Tennessee bureau of investigation, for a state, and/or national and/or international criminal history background check, as well as authorization for a criminal history background check. The results of the criminal history background check shall be forwarded to the commissioner. All costs incurred in conducting the criminal history records check shall be paid by the applicant, in addition to any other application and investigative fees.

No mortgage loan originator license shall be issued unless the commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings:

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction; provided, that a subsequent formal vacation of the revocation shall not be deemed a revocation;

The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in any domestic, foreign or military court:

During the seven-year period preceding the date of application for a mortgage loan originator license; or

At any time preceding the date of application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty or a breach of trust or money laundering;

Provided, that any pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of subdivisions (c)(2)(A)(i) and (ii);

The applicant has demonstrated the financial responsibility, character and general fitness to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the applicant will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter. An individual has shown that the individual is not financially responsible when the individual has shown a disregard in the management of the individual's own financial condition;

The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirements set forth in § 45-13-304; and

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in § 45-13-305.

Upon submission of a properly completed application form, including submission of fingerprints and payment of all applicable fees, the commissioner shall investigate the application to determine whether the applicant qualifies for a license. If the commissioner finds the applicant so qualified, the commissioner shall issue the applicant a mortgage loan originator license that shall expire on December 31 in the year it was issued. If the commissioner does not find the applicant so qualified, the commissioner shall notify the applicant in writing, stating the basis for denial. If the commissioner denies an application or fails to act on a complete application within ninety (90) days, the applicant may make a written demand to the commissioner for a hearing on the question of whether the license should be granted. Any hearing requested under this subsection (d) shall be conducted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; provided, that the individual has requested the hearing in writing within thirty (30) days following the date of the commissioner's denial. At the hearing, the burden of proving that the individual is entitled to a mortgage loan originator license shall be on the individual.

The commissioner shall keep a current roster showing the names of all licensed mortgage loan originators.

The commissioner shall have the authority to require a criminal history background check under subsection (b) at any time as a condition of continued licensure of a mortgage loan originator. Upon request of the commissioner, a mortgage loan originator shall furnish written consent to a criminal history record check and a set of the mortgage loan originator's fingerprints in a form acceptable to the commissioner. Failure to provide the consent and fingerprints within thirty (30) days of the commissioner's request constitutes grounds for the commissioner to suspend or revoke the mortgage loan originator's license or to deny renewal of the license.

Any costs associated with a credit report pulled under this section shall be paid by the applicant.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-303. Mortgage loan originator sponsorship required.

No mortgage loan originator license issued under this part is considered active unless the individual has also been sponsored by a licensed mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker or by a registrant in accordance with the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title. A mortgage loan originator is prohibited from providing origination services with an inactive license. No mortgage loan originator may be sponsored by more than one (1) person at the same time, and the provision of origination services for a person that has not properly sponsored the mortgage loan originator shall constitute a violation of this chapter. Subsections (b)-(e) shall not apply to a mortgage loan originator that is properly sponsored by a registrant under the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act.

To sponsor a mortgage loan originator, a mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker must file with the commissioner the form that the commissioner prescribes and pay to the commissioner a nonrefundable sponsorship fee of one hundred dollars ($100), which fee may be decreased or increased by rule of the commissioner. Upon determining that the individual is duly licensed and not sponsored by any other person, the commissioner shall authorize the sponsorship, which may be done electronically or in writing, or both. A mortgage loan originator sponsorship terminates if the sponsoring mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker's license expires or is revoked or otherwise terminates or if the mortgage loan originator ceases providing services for such company. A mortgage loan originator sponsorship does not terminate if the mortgage loan originator changes from one (1) branch office of the sponsoring mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker to another branch office of the same company. Upon any change in the mortgage loan originator's office, the sponsoring mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall notify the commissioner in writing within fourteen (14) days of the change.

Should a mortgage loan originator sponsorship terminate, the mortgage loan originator's license shall become inactive, but shall not expire so long as the mortgage loan originator continues to meet the requirements for licensure and renewal of licensure. An inactive license is reactivated if the mortgage loan originator obtains a new sponsorship under this section or under the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act. The commissioner may not approve a new sponsorship unless and until the commissioner has been notified that any prior sponsorship has terminated.

The sponsoring mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall ensure that each application for a residential mortgage loan contains the name and license number of the mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker, as well as the name, signature and license number of the mortgage loan originator who provided origination services with respect to the loan. The mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall also ensure that its records pertaining to the residential mortgage loan contain the unique identifier, if different from the license number, of each mortgage loan originator that provided services with respect to the loan.

The sponsoring mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker is responsible for and shall supervise the acts of each sponsored mortgage loan originator.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-304. Prelicensing education of loan originators.

In order to meet the prelicensing education requirement referred to in § 45-13-302(c)(4), an individual shall complete at least twenty (20) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b), which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations;

Three (3) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For purposes of subsection (a), prelicensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or entity.

Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The prelicensing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) for any state shall be accepted as credit toward completion of prelicensing education requirements in this state.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-305. Testing of loan originators.

In order to meet the written test requirement referred to in § 45-13-302(c)(5), an individual shall pass, in accordance with the standards established under this section, a qualified written test developed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of subsection (a) unless the test adequately measures the applicant's knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

State law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination; and

Federal and state law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

Minimum Competence:

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions;

An individual may retake a test three (3) consecutive times with each consecutive taking occurring at least thirty (30) days after the preceding test;

After failing three (3) consecutive tests, an individual shall wait at least six (6) months before taking the test again; and

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five (5) years or longer shall retake the test, not taking into account any time during which the individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-306. Standards for mortgage loan originator license renewal.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include the following:

Continues to meet the minimum standards for licensure under § 45-13-302(c);

Satisfies the annual continuing education requirements described in § 45-13-307; and

Pays a nonrefundable renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100), which amount may be decreased or increased by rule of the commissioner.

To renew a mortgage loan originator license for the following calendar year, the commissioner must receive on or before December 31 a completed renewal application and fee meeting the requirements of subsection (a). If the renewal requirements are not timely met, the mortgage loan originator license shall expire at the close of business on December 31.

Should the commissioner deny a renewal application, the applicant may make written demand to the commissioner for a hearing on the question of whether the license should be renewed; provided, that the request for hearing be received by the commissioner within thirty (30) days from the date of denial; and provided, further, that the failure to timely request a hearing shall cause the license to be automatically revoked without further notice or hearing at the end of the thirty-day period. If a hearing is timely requested under this subsection (c), it shall be conducted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and the license shall not expire until resolution of the appeal in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-307. Continuing education for mortgage loan originators.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements referred to in § 45-13-306(a)(2), a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight (8) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b), which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations;

Two (2) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For purposes of subsection (a), continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity that is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or entity.

Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator:

May only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken; and

May not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator's own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two (2) hours credit for every one (1) hour taught.

A person having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) for any state shall be accepted as credit toward completion of continuing education requirements in this state.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-308. Provisional mortgage loan originator license.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, to the contrary, the commissioner is authorized to issue a provisional mortgage loan originator license to any individual who has not completed the prelicensing education requirements set forth in §45-13-304 or passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in §45-13-305; provided, that the individual meets all other requirements for a license under this part; and provided, further, that no provisional mortgage loan originator license shall be issued after or be valid after July 30, 2010. A provisional mortgage loan originator license shall for all purposes be considered a mortgage loan originator license issued under this part, except that a provisional license shall expire on July 30, 2010, unless the individual holding the license has by such date, completed the prelicensing education requirements set forth in §45-13-304 and passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in §45-13-305. If these education requirements are timely accomplished, and so long as the individual has furnished fingerprints to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry if requested to do so under §45-13-302(f), the provisional nature of the license shall be removed, and the license shall not expire until the end of the calendar year in which the last of all the requirements have been met. Subject to the July 30, 2010, expiration date, a provisional mortgage loan originator license issued in 2009 may be renewed for 2010 pursuant to §45-13-306 without satisfying the annual continuing education requirements described in §45-13-307.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.